incubator/apertium-es-an/apertium-es-an.an.dix
    <pardef n="/aber__vbhaver">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abré</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abremos</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abrás</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abrez</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abrá</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abrán</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aberba</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abérbanos</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aberbas</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abérbaz</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abrá</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abrán</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abendo</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tiene</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tenez</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abié</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abiémos</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abiés</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abiéz</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abié</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abieron</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aber</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eba</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ébanos</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebas</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ébaz</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eba</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eban</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ese</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ésenos</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eses</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ésez</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ese</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esen</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abíu</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> <!-- FIXME! Guess! -->
        <p>
          <l>abíus</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> <!-- FIXME! Guess! -->
        <p>
          <l>abida</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> <!-- FIXME! Guess! -->
        <p>
          <l>abidas</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p>
          <l>abito</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR"> <!-- FIXME! Guess! -->
        <p>
          <l>abitos</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR"> <!-- FIXME! Guess! -->
        <p>
          <l>abita</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR"> <!-- FIXME! Guess! -->
        <p>
          <l>abitas</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emos</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>has</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éz</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>han</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aiga</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aigamos</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aigas</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aigaz</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aiga</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aigan</l>
          <r>aber<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <e lm="aber"><i></i><par n="/aber__vbhaver"/></e>
